Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20132-1083.01
Nursery stock distributor, defined.

Nursery stock
distributor shall mean any person involved in:

(1) The acquisition
and further distribution of nursery stock;

(2) The utilization of nursery stock for
landscaping or purchase of nursery stock for other persons;

(3) The distribution
of nursery stock with a mechanical digger, commonly known as a tree spade,
or by other means;

(4) The solicitation of or taking orders for sales of nursery stock
in the state; or

(5) The growing and distribution of nursery stock or active involvement
in the management or supervision of a nursery.

Laws 2013, LB68, § 7.
September 6, 2013